New Jersey, session 222, S4066.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. The Department of the Treasury shall develop an inventory of all unutilized real property owned by the State, including property owned by an agency, authority, or other instrumentality of the State.  Each State entity, including, but not limited to, the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, the New Jersey Redevelopment Authority, and the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, shall biennially submit a list of unutilized real property under its jurisdiction to the State House Commission and to the Department of the Treasury.  The State House Commission and the Department of the Treasury shall collaboratively compile the lists of unutilized real property submitted by State entities and shall undertake an analysis of those properties to indicate the feasibility of developing, redeveloping, or renovating each identified parcel of real property owned by the State for use as low-income and moderate-income housing, as defined pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-304).  The State House Commission and the Department of the Treasury shall develop their inventory and analysis into a report, and shall submit this report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, on or before the first day of the 13th month next following the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The report shall be updated and resubmitted to the Governor and Legislature on a biennial basis after the initial submission.  Following each biennial submission of the report to the Governor and Legislature, the Department of the Treasury shall post the report on the departments Internet website. As used in this section, unutilized property means a parcel of real property that is owned by the State, and which parcel: does not actively provide employee housing, is not actively generating revenue for the State through a lease or other agreement, and is not actively serving a legitimate public purpose. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.